Maryland, session 2026, SB0044.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
21–502.
(a) (3) A court of competent jurisdiction may expressly order that a benefit
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0044*

SENATE BILL 44
under this Division II be assigned to a spouse, former spouse, child, or other dependent
when [an order of benefit forfeiture is issued] A FORFEITURE OF BENEFITS OCCURS in
accordance with § 21–704 OR § 21–804 of this title.
SUBTITLE 8. FORFEITURE OF BENEFITS.
21–801.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “DOMESTIC RELATIONS ORDER” MEANS AN ORDER ISSUED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 21–502(A)(2) OF THIS TITLE, § 414(P) OF THE INTERNAL
REVENUE CODE, AND REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES THAT
ASSIGNS A BENEFIT TO A SPOUSE, A FORMER SPOUSE, A CHILD, OR ANY OTHER
DEPENDENT OF A PUBLIC EMPLOYEE IN CONNECTION WITH A DECREE OR ORDER OF
ALIMONY, CHILD SUPPORT, OR DIVORCE.
(C) “FINAL ADJUDICATION” MEANS ADJUDICATION BY A TRIAL COURT
RESULTING IN FINAL DISPOSITION OF ALL CHARGES THAT CONSTITUTE A
QUALIFYING CRIME.
(D) “PUBLIC EMPLOYEE” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO:
(1) IS LISTED IN § 21–802 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(2) HAS BEEN CHARGED WITH A QUALIFYING CRIME.
(E) “QUALIFYING CRIME” MEANS A CRIMINAL OFFENSE UNDER § 3–303, §
3–304, § 3–309, OR § 3–310 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE THAT IS COMMITTED IN
THE COURSE OF THE PERFORMANCE OF THE PUBLIC EMPLOYEE’S DUTIES AND
RESPONSIBILITIES.
(F) “RETIREMENT ALLOWANCE”:
(1) HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 20–101 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(2) INCLUDES A VESTED ALLOWANCE.
(G) “VESTED ALLOWANCE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 20–101 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
21–802.

SENATE BILL 44 3
(A) THIS SUBTITLE APPLIES TO AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS A MEMBER, FORMER
MEMBER, OR RETIREE OF:
(1) THE STATE POLICE RETIREMENT SYSTEM;
(2) THE LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS’ PENSION SYSTEM;
(3) THE EMPLOYEES’ PENSION SYSTEM OR THE EMPLOYEES’
RETIREMENT SYSTEM;
(4) THE TEACHERS’ PENSION SYSTEM OR THE TEACHERS’
RETIREMENT SYSTEM;
(5) THE CORRECTIONAL OFFICERS’ RETIREMENT SYSTEM; OR
(6) THE JUDGES’ RETIREMENT SYSTEM.
(B) THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT APPLY TO ANY SERVICE EARNED BEFORE
JULY 1, 2026.
21–803.
(A) BENEFITS UNDER THIS DIVISION II OF THIS ARTICLE PAYABLE TO A
PUBLIC EMPLOYEE ARE SUBJECT TO FORFEITURE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SUBTITLE IF THE PUBLIC EMPLOYEE IS FOUND GUILTY OF, PLEADS GUILTY TO, OR
ENTERS A PLEA OF NOLO CONTENDERE TO A QUALIFYING CRIME.
(B) (1) BENEFITS UNDER THIS DIVISION II MAY NOT BE FORFEITED OR
REDUCED IF THE INTERNAL REVENUE SERVICE DETERMINES THAT THE
FORFEITURE OR REDUCTION WILL NEGATIVELY AFFECT OR INVALIDATE THE TAX
QUALIFIED STATUS OF ANY OF THE SEVERAL SYSTEMS.
(2) IF THE INTERNAL REVENUE SERVICE DETERMINES THAT THE
APPLICATION OF THIS SUBTITLE WOULD NEGATIVELY AFFECT OR INVALIDATE THE
TAX QUALIFIED STATUS OF ANY OF THE SEVERAL SYSTEMS, ANY FORFEITURE OF
BENEFITS THAT TOOK PLACE BEFORE THE INTERNAL REVENUE SERVICE’S
DETERMINATION SHALL BE REVERSED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 21–807 OF THIS
SUBTITLE TO THE EXTENT NECESSARY TO COMPLY WITH THE DETERMINATION.
21–804.
(A) IF THE FINAL ADJUDICATION OF CHARGES RESULTS IN CONVICTION OF

SENATE BILL 44
A PUBLIC EMPLOYEE, THE PUBLIC EMPLOYEE’S RETIREMENT ALLOWANCE SHALL BE
FORFEITED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(B) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTIONS (C), (D), AND (E) OF
THIS SECTION, BENEFITS MAY NOT BE PAID TO A PUBLIC EMPLOYEE IF THE BOARD
OF TRUSTEES FINDS BY CLEAR AND CONVINCING EVIDENCE THAT:
(I) THE PUBLIC EMPLOYEE WAS CONVICTED OF A QUALIFYING
CRIME;
(II) THE PUBLIC EMPLOYEE WAS A MEMBER OF THE STATE
POLICE RETIREMENT SYSTEM, THE LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS’ PENSION
SYSTEM, THE EMPLOYEES’ PENSION SYSTEM, THE EMPLOYEES’ RETIREMENT
SYSTEM, THE TEACHERS’ PENSION SYSTEM, THE TEACHERS’ RETIREMENT
SYSTEM, THE CORRECTIONAL OFFICERS’ RETIREMENT SYSTEM, OR THE JUDGES’
RETIREMENT SYSTEM; AND
(III) THE QUALIFYING CRIME FOR WHICH THE PUBLIC
EMPLOYEE WAS CONVICTED WAS COMMITTED WHILE THE PUBLIC EMPLOYEE WAS
AN ACTIVE MEMBER OF THE STATE POLICE RETIREMENT SYSTEM, THE LAW
ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS’ PENSION SYSTEM, THE EMPLOYEES’ PENSION SYSTEM,
THE EMPLOYEES’ RETIREMENT SYSTEM, THE TEACHERS’ PENSION SYSTEM, THE
TEACHERS’ RETIREMENT SYSTEM, THE CORRECTIONAL OFFICERS’ RETIREMENT
SYSTEM, OR THE JUDGES’ RETIREMENT SYSTEM.
(2) ONLY SERVICE CREDIT IN THE STATE SYSTEM IN WHICH THE
PUBLIC EMPLOYEE IS A MEMBER WHEN THE QUALIFYING CRIME IS COMMITTED IS
ELIGIBLE FOR FORFEITURE UNDER THIS SECTION.
(C) (1) A PUBLIC EMPLOYEE CONVICTED OF A QUALIFYING CRIME MAY,
WITHIN 1 YEAR AFTER THE CONVICTION, FILE A CLAIM IN CIRCUIT COURT FOR A
PARTIAL PAYMENT OF THE PUBLIC EMPLOYEE’S RETIREMENT ALLOWANCE.
(2) NOTICE OF THE CLAIM FILED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE SERVED ON THE STATE RETIREMENT AGENCY.
(3) WHEN CONSIDERING A CLAIM OF A PUBLIC EMPLOYEE UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE COURT SHALL CONSIDER:
(I) THE SEVERITY OF THE CRIME;
(II) THE AMOUNT OF MONETARY LOSS SUFFERED BY THE
STATE, A COUNTY, A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION, OR A PERSON AS A RESULT OF THE
CRIME;

SENATE BILL 44 5
(III) THE DEGREE OF PUBLIC TRUST PLACED IN THE PUBLIC
EMPLOYEE;
(IV) THE FINANCIAL NEEDS AND RESOURCES OF THE PUBLIC
EMPLOYEE;
(V) THE FINANCIAL NEEDS AND RESOURCES OF THE PUBLIC
EMPLOYEE’S SPOUSE, CHILDREN, OR OTHER DEPENDENTS;
(VI) ANY INTEREST IN BENEFITS OF A FORMER SPOUSE
ESTABLISHED UNDER AN EXISTING DOMESTIC RELATIONS ORDER; AND
(VII) ANY OTHER FACTORS THE COURT DETERMINES RELEVANT.
(D) (1) A SPOUSE, A FORMER SPOUSE, A CHILD, OR ANY OTHER
DEPENDENT OF A PUBLIC EMPLOYEE CONVICTED OF A QUALIFYING CRIME MAY,
WITHIN 1 YEAR AFTER THE CONVICTION, FILE A CLAIM IN CIRCUIT COURT FOR A
PARTIAL PAYMENT OF THE PUBLIC EMPLOYEE’S RETIREMENT ALLOWANCE FOR
PURPOSES OF CHILD SUPPORT, ALIMONY, OR MARITAL PROPERTY RIGHTS.
(2) NOTICE OF THE CLAIM FILED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE SERVED ON THE STATE RETIREMENT AGENCY.
(3) THE COURT MAY ENTER A DOMESTIC RELATIONS ORDER THAT
PROVIDES THAT SOME OR ALL OF THE FORFEITED BENEFITS BE PAID TO A SPOUSE,
A FORMER SPOUSE, A CHILD, OR ANY OTHER DEPENDENT FOR PURPOSES OF CHILD
SUPPORT, ALIMONY, OR MARITAL PROPERTY RIGHTS.
(4) WHEN DETERMINING WHETHER TO ENTER A DOMESTIC
RELATIONS ORDER UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, THE COURT SHALL CONSIDER
WHETHER THE PUBLIC EMPLOYEE’S SPOUSE, FORMER SPOUSE, CHILDREN, OR
OTHER DEPENDENTS WERE CULPABLE OR COMPLICIT IN THE COMMISSION OF THE
QUALIFYING CRIME.
(5) THE COURT MAY NOT ORDER BENEFITS TO BE PAID TO A PUBLIC
EMPLOYEE’S SPOUSE, FORMER SPOUSE, CHILD, OR OTHER DEPENDENT IN A
MANNER THAT IS INCONSISTENT WITH THE PAYMENT OF BENEFITS IN THE STATE
SYSTEM IN WHICH THE PUBLIC EMPLOYEE WAS A MEMBER.
(E) (1) A FORFEITURE OF BENEFITS UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT
IMPAIR OR ALTER AN EXISTING DOMESTIC RELATIONS ORDER PROVIDING BENEFITS
TO A FORMER SPOUSE OF A PUBLIC EMPLOYEE.

SENATE BILL 44
(2) A PUBLIC EMPLOYEE’S INTEREST IN A BENEFIT OF A FORMER
SPOUSE ESTABLISHED BY A DOMESTIC RELATIONS ORDER MAY NOT BE SUBJECT TO
A FORFEITURE OR REDUCTION UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(F) BENEFITS AVAILABLE TO A PUBLIC EMPLOYEE AS A BENEFICIARY MAY
NOT BE SUBJECT TO A FORFEITURE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
21–805.
(A) IF A PUBLIC EMPLOYEE HAS RETIRED BEFORE BEING CONVICTED OF A
QUALIFYING CRIME, THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES MAY RECOVER FROM THE PUBLIC
EMPLOYEE THE AMOUNT OF BENEFITS PAID TO THE PUBLIC EMPLOYEE BEFORE THE
CONVICTION.
(B) THE RECOVERY UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION IS LIMITED
TO AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE BENEFITS THAT WOULD HAVE BEEN FORFEITED HAD
THE CONVICTION OCCURRED BEFORE THE PUBLIC EMPLOYEE BEGAN RECEIVING
ANY BENEFITS AS A RETIREE.
21–806.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO A PUBLIC EMPLOYEE WHO IS NOT A RETIREE.
(B) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, A PUBLIC EMPLOYEE
MAY SUBMIT AN APPLICATION FOR RETIREMENT.
(C) IF A PUBLIC EMPLOYEE IS ELIGIBLE TO APPLY FOR A RETIREMENT
ALLOWANCE, A PUBLIC EMPLOYEE’S APPLICATION FOR RETIREMENT BENEFITS:
(1) SHALL BE CONSIDERED SUBMITTED ON THE FIRST DAY OF THE
MONTH AFTER IT IS PROPERLY COMPLETED AND SUBMITTED TO THE STATE
RETIREMENT AGENCY; AND
(2) MAY NOT BE PROCESSED BY THE STATE RETIREMENT AGENCY
UNLESS AND UNTIL THE FINAL ADJUDICATION OF THE CHARGE DOES NOT RESULT
IN CONVICTION.
21–807.
(A) (1) ON RECEIPT OF AN ORDER THAT REVERSES OR OVERTURNS A
CONVICTION OF A PUBLIC EMPLOYEE, THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES SHALL RESCIND
THE FORFEITURE OF BENEFITS AND PAY ANY BENEFITS THAT ARE PAYABLE UNDER
THIS DIVISION II OF THIS ARTICLE TO THE PUBLIC EMPLOYEE.

SENATE BILL 44 7
(2) WHEN A CONVICTION IS OVERTURNED, ANY DOMESTIC
RELATIONS ORDER ENTERED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 21–804(D) OF THIS SUBTITLE
IS TERMINATED AND THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES MAY NOT PAY ANY BENEFITS IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE ORDER.
(B) IF A CONVICTION OF A PUBLIC EMPLOYEE WHO WAS A RETIREE BEFORE
THE DATE OF CONVICTION IS OVERTURNED:
(1) THE PUBLIC EMPLOYEE’S BENEFITS SHALL BE RESTORED BACK
TO THE DATE THE BENEFIT PAYMENTS CEASED;
(2) THE ALLOWANCE SHALL:
(I) BE PAID BEGINNING THE MONTH AFTER THE STATE
RETIREMENT AGENCY IS NOTIFIED THAT THE CONVICTION IS OVERTURNED; AND
(II) INCLUDE ANY COST–OF–LIVING ADJUSTMENTS THAT
WOULD HAVE BEEN MADE IN THE TIME BETWEEN THE CONVICTION AND THE TIME
BENEFIT PAYMENTS ARE RESTORED; AND
(3) BENEFIT PAYMENTS THAT WOULD HAVE BEEN MADE DURING THE
TIME FROM THE DATE OF CONVICTION TO THE DATE THE CONVICTION IS
OVERTURNED SHALL BE MADE TO THE PUBLIC EMPLOYEE, LESS ANY PAYMENTS:
(I) MADE IN ACCORDANCE WITH A DOMESTIC RELATIONS
ORDER DIRECTING PAYMENT OF BENEFITS TO A SPOUSE, A FORMER SPOUSE, A
CHILD, OR ANY OTHER DEPENDENT; AND
(II) RECEIVED BY THE PUBLIC EMPLOYEE IN ACCORDANCE
WITH AN ORDER ISSUED UNDER § 21–804 OF THIS SUBTITLE GRANTING THE PUBLIC
EMPLOYEE A PARTIAL PAYMENT OF BENEFITS.
(C) IF A CONVICTION OF A PUBLIC EMPLOYEE WHO WAS NOT A RETIREE
BEFORE THE DATE OF CONVICTION IS OVERTURNED, THE PUBLIC EMPLOYEE MAY
RECEIVE BENEFITS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS DIVISION II OF THIS ARTICLE.
21–808.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A
PUBLIC EMPLOYEE SUBJECT TO A FORFEITURE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE IS ENTITLED
TO A RETURN OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S ACCUMULATED CONTRIBUTIONS ON REQUEST
UNDER § 29–501 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) THE PUBLIC EMPLOYEE’S ACCUMULATED CONTRIBUTIONS SHALL BE

SENATE BILL 44
REDUCED BY AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO ANY BENEFIT PAYMENTS RECEIVED BY THE
PUBLIC EMPLOYEE THAT WOULD HAVE BEEN SUBJECT TO FORFEITURE AND HAVE
NOT BEEN RECOVERED BY THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES UNDER § 21–805 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
21–809.
THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS
SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any crime committed before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.